Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1306
Intangible personal property distributable in voluntary dissolution; presumed abandoned; when.

All intangible personal property distributable in the course of a voluntary dissolution of a business association, banking organization, or financial organization organized under the laws of or created in this state, that is unclaimed by the owner within two years after the date for distribution, is presumed abandoned.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 6, p. 2482;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 8.